test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-liiem_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - līem: # Noun 151 'eng /est leem/fin' - full paradigm
     līem+N+Sg+Nom: līem
     līem+N+Sg+Gen: līem
     līem+N+Sg+Par: līemtõ
     līem+N+Sg+Dat: līemõn
     līem+N+Sg+Ins: līemkõks
     līem+N+Sg+Ill: līemõ
     līem+N+Sg+Ela: līemstõ
     līem+N+Pl+Nom: līemõd
     līem+N+Pl+Gen: līemõd
     līem+N+Pl+Par: līemidi
     līem+N+Pl+Dat: līemõdõn
     līem+N+Pl+Ins: līemõdõks
     līem+N+Pl+Ill: līemiž
     līem+N+Pl+Ela: līemist
